West Virginia, session 2025, HB3267.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12. GENERAL AND SPECIFIC POWERS, DUTIES AND ALLIED RELATIONS OF MUNICIPALITIES, GOVERNING BODIES AND MUNICIPAL OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES; SUITS AGAINST MUNICIPALITIES. §8-12-28. Exemption from local taxes and fees. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, a duly elected municipal utility board, its contractors, subcontractors, and vendors shall be exempt from the imposition of any local tax, fee, assessment, or charge by any municipality on construction projects.  This exemption includes, but is not limited to, local sales taxes, business and occupation taxes, and any other local imposition on the goods, services, or activities related to a construction project.